Hawaii statutes.
[§321-1.1 Development of environmental
goals and objectives.] The department of health, with input from the
regulated community and general public, shall develop environmental goals and
objectives, to be used in the implementation of its programs which shall ensure
that the following natural resources are protected: air quality; land; coastal
waters; inland waters; and groundwater. It shall also be the goal of the
department to organize its environmental protection programs to improve the
coordination of environmental planning and oversight; improve the enforcement
of environmental laws, rules, and policies; and improve the ability to
identify, prevent, and respond to significant releases of pollutants into the
environment. The department of health shall ensure that the environmental
goals and objectives will remain current by reviewing them every two years,
with input from the regulated community and the general public. The department
shall report its findings and conclusions following each such review, to the
legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the legislative
session immediately following the completion of the review. [L 1996, c 290, §4]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next